Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 1355, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 370, O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 1355), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1355. There are hereby specifically exempted from the


tax levied pursuant to the provisions of Section 1350 et seq. of


this title:


1. Sale of gasoline, motor fuel, methanol, “M-85” which is a


mixture of methanol and gasoline containing at least eighty-five


percent (85%) methanol, compressed natural gas, liquefied natural


gas, or liquefied petroleum gas on which the Motor Fuel Tax motor


fuel tax, Gasoline Excise Tax gasoline excise tax, Special Fuels Tax

Req. No. 2430 Page 1


special fuels tax, or the fee in lieu of Special Fuels Tax special


fuels tax levied in Section 500.1 et seq., Section 601 et seq. or


Section 701 et seq. of this title has been, or will be paid;


2. For the sale Sale of motor vehicles or any optional


equipment or accessories attached to motor vehicles on which the


Oklahoma Motor Vehicle Excise Tax motor vehicle excise tax levied in


Section 2101 et seq. of this title has been, or will be paid, all


but a portion of the levy provided under Section 1354 of this title,


equal to one and twenty-five-hundredths percent (1.25%) of the gross


receipts of such sales. For the purposes of this paragraph, if the


sale of a motor vehicle includes a trade-in, gross receipts shall be


calculated based only on the difference between the value of the


trade-in vehicle and the actual sales price of the vehicle being


purchased. Provided, the sale of motor vehicles shall not be


subject to any sales and use taxes levied by cities, counties, or


other jurisdictions of the state;


3. Sale of crude petroleum or natural or casinghead gas, and


other products subject to gross production tax pursuant to the


provisions of Section 1001 et seq. and Section 1101 et seq. of this


title. This exemption shall not apply when such products are sold


to a consumer or user for consumption or use, except when used for


injection into the earth for the purpose of promoting or


facilitating the production of oil or gas. This paragraph shall not



Req. No. 2430 Page 2


operate to increase or repeal the gross production tax levied by the


laws of this state;


4. Sale of aircraft on which the tax levied pursuant to the


provisions of Sections 6001 through 6007 of this title has been, or


will be paid, or which are specifically exempt from such tax


pursuant to the provisions of Section 6003 of this title;


5. Sales from coin-operated devices on which the fee imposed by


Sections 1501 through 1512 of this title has been paid;


6. Leases of twelve (12) months or more of motor vehicles in


which the owners of the vehicles have paid the motor vehicle excise


tax levied by Section 2103 of this title;


7. Sales of charity game equipment on which a tax is levied


pursuant to the Oklahoma Charity Games Act, Section 401 et seq. of


Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes, or which is sold to an


organization that is:


a. a veterans’ organization exempt from taxation pursuant


to the provisions of paragraph (4), (7), (8), (10), or


(19) of subsection (c) of Section 501 of the United


States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c) et seq.,


b. a group home for mentally disabled individuals exempt


from taxation pursuant to the provisions of paragraph


(3) of subsection (c) of Section 501 of the United



Req. No. 2430 Page 3


States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c) et seq., or


c. a charitable health care organization which is exempt


from taxation pursuant to the provisions of paragraph


(3) of subsection (c) of Section 501 of the United


States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c) et seq.;


8. Sales of cigarettes or tobacco products to:


a. a federally recognized Indian tribe or nation which


has entered into a compact with the State of Oklahoma


pursuant to the provisions of subsection C of Section


346 of this title or to a licensee of such a tribe or


nation, upon which the payment in lieu of taxes


required by the compact has been paid, or


b. a federally recognized Indian tribe or nation or to a


licensee of such a tribe or nation upon which the tax


levied pursuant to the provisions of Section 349.1 or


Section 426 of this title has been paid;


9. Leases of aircraft upon which the owners have paid the


aircraft excise tax levied by Section 6001 et seq. of this title or


which are specifically exempt from such tax pursuant to the


provisions of Section 6003 of this title;


10. The sale of low-speed or medium-speed electrical vehicles


on which the Oklahoma Motor Vehicle Excise Tax motor vehicle excise

Req. No. 2430 Page 4


tax levied in Section 2101 et seq. of this title has been or will be


paid;


11. Effective January 1, 2005, sales of cigarettes on which the


tax levied in Section 301 et seq. of this title or tobacco products


on which the tax levied in Section 401 et seq. of this title has


been paid; and


12. Sales of electricity at charging stations as defined by


Section 6502 of this title when the electricity is sold by a


charging station owner or operator for purposes of charging an


electric vehicle as defined by Section 6502 of this title and the


tax imposed pursuant to Section 6504 of this title is collected and


remitted to the Oklahoma Tax Commission.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 1404, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 370, O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 1404), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1404. The provisions of Section 1401 et seq. of this


title shall not apply:


1. In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal


property brought into the State of Oklahoma this state by a


nonresident individual, visiting in this state, for his or her


personal use or enjoyment, while within the state;


2. In respect to the use of tangible personal property


purchased for resale before being used;



Req. No. 2430 Page 5


3. In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal


property on which a tax, equal to or in excess of that levied by


Section 1401 et seq. of this title, has been paid by the person


using such tangible personal property in this state, whether such


tax was levied under the laws of this state or some other state of


the United States. If any article of tangible personal property has


already been subjected to a tax, by this or any other state, in


respect to its sale or use, in an amount less than the tax imposed


by Section 1401 et seq. of this title, the provisions of Section


1401 et seq. of this title shall apply to it by a rate measured by


the difference only between the rate herein provided and the rate by


which the previous tax upon the sale or use was computed. Provided,


that no credit shall be given for taxes paid in another state, if


that state does not grant like credit for taxes paid in this state;


4. In respect to the use of tangible personal property now


specifically exempted from taxation under the Oklahoma Sales Tax


Code. Provided, for the sale of motor vehicles or any optional


equipment or accessories attached to motor vehicles on which the


Oklahoma Motor Vehicle Excise Tax levied pursuant to Sections 2101


through 2108 of this title has been, or will be paid, the exceptions


shall apply to all but a portion of the levy provided under Section


1402 of this title, equal to one and twenty-five-hundredths percent


(1.25%) of the purchase price. For the purposes of this paragraph,


if the sale of a motor vehicle includes a trade-in, the purchase

Req. No. 2430 Page 6


price shall be calculated based only on the difference between the


value of the trade-in vehicle and the actual purchase price of the


vehicle being purchased. Provided further, the sale of motor


vehicles shall not be subject to any sales and use taxes levied by


cities, counties, or other jurisdictions of the state;


5. In respect to the use of any article or tangible personal


property brought into the state by an individual with intent to


become a resident of this state where such personal property is for


such individual’s personal use or enjoyment;


6. In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal


property used or to be used by commercial airlines or railroads;


7. In respect to livestock purchased outside this state and


brought into this state for feeding or breeding purposes, and which


is later resold; and


8. Effective January 1, 1991, in respect to the use of rail


transportation cars to haul coal to coal-fired plants located in


this state which generate electric power.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2430 QD 1/9/2026 11:02:00 AM









Req. No. 2430 Page 7